Vermont statutes. Title 24 Municipal and County Government
Subchapter 4. Interlocal Contracts

§ 4901.
Authorization.

Any one or more municipalities may contract with any one or more other municipalities to perform any governmental service, activity, or undertaking which each municipality entering into the contract is authorized by law to perform, provided that the legislative body of each municipality approves the contract, and expenses for such governmental service, activity, or undertaking are included in a municipal budget approved under

17 V.S.A. § 2664

or comparable charter provision.

If the interlocal contract is such that the participating municipalities or their legislative bodies, commissions, boards, officers, or voters have the authority to enter into it, by virtue of any charter provision, statute, or the general authority of such municipality or its officers and bodies, then the procedures of this section for approval shall not be exclusive, it being the intent that the powers and procedures set forth in this subchapter for interlocal contracts are supplementary to any other powers or procedures heretofore or hereafter possessed by any municipality.

A municipality may submit an interlocal contract to the Attorney General prior to approval by its legislative body. If such a contract is submitted, the Attorney General shall determine whether the contract is in proper form and compatible with the laws of this State and notify the legislative body of the municipality of his or her determination. In the event that the Attorney General does not respond to the request within 30 days after receipt of a copy of the contract, the legislative body may approve the contract.

HISTORY:

Added

1969, No. 197

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

1973, No. 250

(Adj. Sess.), § 5;

2003, No. 122

(Adj. Sess.), § 85k.

§ 4902.
Contents of contract.

The contract shall set forth fully the purposes, powers, rights, and objectives, and responsibilities of the contracting parties.

The contract may provide:

That one person shall hold the same office or offices in the participating municipalities, notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary.

The method of choosing officers by election or appointment, the term of office, the compensation of, or mode of setting the compensation of, and the authority to discharge, a person holding office under subdivision (1) of this subsection.

For any duly constituted local or regional board to have jurisdiction in all the municipalities.

For a transfer of a local service function or activity or a portion thereof, previously authorized or exercised by a municipality, to another municipality.

For the acquisition and maintenance of property, forces, and services which the municipalities participating in the contract are authorized by law to acquire and maintain.

For the use of any property, equipment, or personnel of a municipality that is a party to the contract in connection with a joint service or activity authorized by the terms of the contract.

For the deposit of funds appropriated, received, or contributed for purposes of any joint municipal activity or service in one or more special bank accounts, and for designation of persons authorized to have custody of and to draw on such funds.

For the exercise of any powers consistent with law in order to carry out the purposes contemplated in the contract.

HISTORY:

Added

1969, No. 197

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.